src-fst-root.lexc.md
# Morphology
The morphological division of Finnish words has three classes: verbal,
nominal and others. The verbs are identified by personal, temporal,
modal and infinite inflection. The nominals are identified by numeral and
case inflection. The others are, apart from being the rest, identified by
defective or missing inflection.

## Symbols used for analysis `Multichar_Symbols`
The Finnish morphological implementation uses analysis symbols mainly to
encode morphological analyses, the rest are implemented else where. Some
non-morphological analyses or classifications are retained for
interoperability and historical reasons. There are further details and
examples of this classification in other parts of this documents; this page
merely summarises the codes used in this version of the system.
### Parts-of-speech
The main morphological division of words is merely: Verbs, Nominals,
Rest.
The syntactic and semantic subdivision is realised in POS tags.
The nominals consist of nouns (substantiivi), adjectives, pro words
and numerals. Verbs are non-divisible, but include infinitive and particple
forms. The others are subdivided into adpositions, adverbs and particles.
Further reading: [VISK s.v.
sanaluokka|http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/visk_termit.cgi?h_id=sCABBIDAI],
[VISK § 438](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=438).

### Temporary list of added tags
These tags were added as part of a tag unification, and should be
put where they belong.

Are there tags not declared in root.lexc or misspelled?
Have a look at these:
* `+Dash		            `: XXX check this tag!
* `+Dial/Finland           `: XXX check this tag!
* `+Dial/standard          `: XXX check this tag!
* `+Gyr		            `: XXX check this tag!
* `+Pref-		            `: XXX check this tag!
* `+Pro		            `: XXX check this tag!
* `+TruncPrefix            `: XXX check this tag!
* `+Use/N		            `: XXX check this tag!
* `+Use/sub	            `: XXX check this tag!
* `+s			            `: XXX check this tag!

* **+CLBfinal**  Sentence final abbreviated expression ending in full stop, so that the full stop is ambiguous

### Parts of speech

* `+V `: Verb
* `+N `: Noun
* `+A `: Adjective
* `+ACR `: Acronym
* `+ABBR `: Abbreviation
* +Symbol = independent symbols in the text stream, like £, €, ©
* `+Acr `: Acronym
* `+Num `: Numerals
* `+Adv `: Adverb
* `+Pron `: Pronoun
* `+Pcle  `: Particle, except:
* `+Interj `: Interjection
* `+Cmt `: hmm, what is this?

* `+IV `: Intransitive verb
* `+TV  `: Transitive verb

The part-of-speech analyses are typically the first:

* Analysis examples examples:*
* *kutoo:* `kutoa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3` (Eng. # knits)
* *talo:* `talo+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # house)
* *nopea:* `nopea+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # fast)
* *yksi:* `yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # one)
* *nopeasti:* `nopeasti+Adv` (Eng. # fast)
* *hän:* `hän+Pron+Pers+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # he)
* *ahaa:* `ahaa+Pcle` (Eng. # ah)
* *äh:* `äh+Interj` (Eng. # uh)

### Nouns
In nominal analyses, the proper nouns have additional subanalysis.
Proper nouns are usually written with initial capitals–or more recently,
totally arbitrary capitalisations, such as in brand names nVidia and ATi.
Proper nouns do have full inflectional morphology exactly as other nouns, but
work slightly differently in derivation and compounding. Some capitalised
nouns may also lose capitalisation in derivation.
[VISK § 98](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=98)

The code for proper nouns:
* `+Prop `: Proper noun

Proper noun tag follows noun analysis:
* *Pekka:* `Pekka+N+Prop+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # Pekka)

### Pronouns
Pronominal analyses have some semantic classes.
[VISK § 101](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=101)–104.
Codes for various semantic classes:
* `+Pers  `: Personal
* `+Dem `: Demonstrative
* `+Interr `: Interrogative
* `+Rel `: Relative
* `+Qu `: Quantor
* `+Qnt `: Quantor?????
* `+Refl `: Reflexive
* `+Recipr `: Reciprocal
* `+Indef `: Indefinite

Semantic tags follow pronoun analyses:
* *minä:* `minä+Pron+Pers+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # I)
* *tämä:* `tämä+Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # this)
* *kuka:* `kuka+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # who)
* *joka:* `joka+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # which)
* *kaikki:* `kaikki+Pron+Qu+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # every)
* *itse:* `itse+Pron+Refl+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # self)
* *toistaan:* `toinen+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Par+PxSg3` (Eng. # each other)
* *joku:* `joku+Pron+Qu+Indef+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # someone)

* `+Sem/Human `: Semantic class: Human
* `+Sem/Geo `: Semantic class: Geographic
* `+Sem/Org `: Semantic class: Organisation

* `+Sem/Build		        `:
* `+Sem/Build-room	        `:
* `+Sem/Cat		        `:
* `+Sem/Date		        `:
* `+Sem/Domain		        `:
* `+Sem/Dummytag	        `:
* `+Sem/Event		        `:
* `+Sem/Fem		        `:
* `+Sem/Group_Hum	        `:
* `+Sem/Hum		        `:
* `+Sem/ID			        `:
* `+Sem/Mal		        `:
* `+Sem/Mat		        `:
* `+Sem/Measr		        `:
* `+Sem/Money		        `:
* `+Sem/Obj		        `:
* `+Sem/Obj-el		        `:
* `+Sem/Obj-ling	        `:
* `+Sem/Org_Prod-audio     `:
* `+Sem/Org_Prod-vis       `:
* `+Sem/Plc		        `:
* `+Sem/Prod-vis	        `:
* `+Sem/Route		        `:
* `+Sem/Rule		        `:
* `+Sem/State-sick	        `:
* `+Sem/Substnc	        `:
* `+Sem/Time-clock	        `:
* `+Sem/Tool-it	        `:
* `+Sem/Txt		        `:
* `+Sem/Veh		        `:
* `+Sem/Year		        `:

### Numerals
In numeral analyses, there are multiple analyses.
The numerals have semantic subcategories
([VISK § 770](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=770)).
The classical ordinal  numbers  have been adjectivised in current
descriptions ([VISK § 771](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=771)),
the  ordinal interpretation is still spelled out in subcategories. The
numbers are often  written with digits or other specific notations.
Numeral class tags:
* `+Card  `: Cardinal
* `+Ord `: Ordinals

* *kolme:* `kolme+Num+Card+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # three)
* *kolmas:* `kolmas+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # third)

### Particles
The particles are subcategorised syntax-wise into conjunctions for all words,
that govern subclauses
([VISK § 812](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=812)). The
conjunctions are further divided, whether the subclause is coordinant or
subordinant to the governing clause and few other syntactic types
([VISK § 816](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=816)). _N.B._ that
the division to subordinating and coordinating conjucntions is motivated
by other systems, including legacy systems, whereas the grammar presents
also different  categorisations for conjunctions (including naming
subordination adverbials).
Conjunction syntax tags:
* `+CC `: Coordinating
* `+CS `: Adverbial

The conjunction tags take place of part-of-speech tags for legacy reasons:
* *ja:* `ja+CC`
* *vaikka:* `vaikka+CS`

### Adpositions
In adposition anlayses, the syntactic tendencies are shown in sub-analyses;
whether they appear typically before or after their heads
[VISK § 687](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=687).

Adposition syntax tags:
* `+Adp `: Adposition
* `+Po `: Postposition
* `+Pr `: Preposition

Adpositions are tagged in POS position:
* *läpi:* `läpi+Po`

Tags for sub-POS

* `+Arab			        `:
* `+Attr			        `:
* `+Coll			        `:
* `+Rom			        `:

### Bound root morphs
The lexical items that appear as bound morphemes before head word are
classified as prefixes ([VISK §
172|http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=172]). Prefixes are rare and
mostly of foreign  origin. The singular forms of plurale tantums are also
potential prefixes.

* `+Pref `: Prefixes

Suffixes are typically word forms or derivations that only appear as
bound morphs. Other than that Finnish does not really have proper suffixes.
This means that suffixed words are in effect compounds of where the last
word just doesn't appear as free morph.
* `+Suff `: Suffixes

### Symbols
Symbols are not part of linguistic data per se so we classify them according
to the needs of end user applications

* `+Punct `: any punctuation
* `+Quote `: quote marks

The analyses for symbols are like POSes:
* *.:* `.+Punct` (Eng. # .)

### Nominal analyses
The analyses of nominals show the inflection in number. Nominals inflect in
number, to mark plurality of the word. The number for nouns is either
singular or plural.
Further reading: [VISK § 79](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=79)
Number tags:
* `+Sg `: Singular
* `+Pl `: Plural

Number tags are next to POSes in nominal analyses, and in order of morphs:
* *padassa:* `pata+N+Sg+Ine` (Eng. # pot)
* *padoissa:* `pata+N+Pl+Ine`

The analyses of nominals have case inflection marked.
The nominals have case inflection
([VISK § 81](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=81))
to mark syntactic roles
(nominative, partitive, accusative-genitive) and semantics
(others, partially even syntactic cases).
* `+Nom `: (Mostly) Syntactic cases: Nominative
* `+Par `: Partitive
* `+Gen `: Genitive
* `+Ine `: Inner Locative cases: Inessive
* `+Ela `: Elative
* `+Ill `: Illative
* `+Ade `: Outer locative cases: Adessive
* `+Abl `: Ablative
* `+All `: Allative
* `+Ess `: Others, semantic, marginal: Essive
* `+Ins `: Instructive
* `+Abe `: Abessive
* `+Tra `: Translative
* `+Com `: Comitative

The case is next to number and last obligatory analysis in nominals:
* *taloa:* `talo+N+Sg+Par`
* *talon:* `talo+N+Sg+Gen`
* *talossa:* `talo+N+Sg+Ine`
* *talosta:* `talo+N+Sg+Ela`
* *taloon:* `talo+N+Sg+Ill`
* *talolla:* `talo+N+Sg+Ade`
* *talolta:* `talo+N+Sg+Abl`
* *talolle:* `talo+N+Sg+All`
* *talona:* `talo+N+Sg+Ess`
* *taloin:* `talo+N+Pl+Ins`
* *talotta:* `talo+N+Sg+Abe`
* *taloksi:* `talo+N+Sg+Tra`
* *taloine:* `talo+N+Com`

The analyses of a infinitive short form have lative ending; this is largely
historical ([VISK § 120](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=120)).
Some adpositions might have same analysis in diachronic analyses.

* `+Lat `: Lative case

The analyses of certain nominals give explicit analysis for accusative case.
The accusative case has distinctive marker in few pronouns and these are only
cases that are analysed as accusatives.
([VISK § 81](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=81)).
Other accusatives have the same case marking as genitive form, and only use
that analysis in synchronic analyses.

* `+Acc `: Explicit accusative analysis

* *hänet:* `hän+Pron+Pers+Sg+Acc`

Adverbs and adpositions may have some special analyses in diachronic
analyses.
Further reading: [VISK §
371|http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=371] – 385

* `+Prl `: Adverbial cases: Prolative
* `+Distr `: Distributive
* `+Tempr `: Temporal

### Possessives
The analyses of nominals include possessive if present.
Posessive ending indicates ownership. The possessive can take six possible
values from singular and plural, first, second and third person references,
where third person form is always ambiguous over plurality.
Further reading: [VISK § 95](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=95)
* `+PxSg1 `: Possessives: First singular (mine)
* `+PxSg2 `: Second singular (yours)
* `+PxSg3 `: Third singular (his)
* `+PxPl1 `: First plural (ours)
* `+PxPl2 `: Second plural (yours)
* `+PxPl3 `: Third plural (theirs)
* `+Px3 `: Third ambiguous (his/theirs)

* `+Sg1 `: Verbs: First singular (I)
* `+Sg2 `: Second singular (your
* `+Sg3 `: Third singular (he)
* `+Pl1 `: First plural (we)
* `+Pl2 `: Second plural (you)
* `+Pl3 `: Third plural (thy)

* *taloni:* `talo+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1`
* *talosi:* `talo+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2`
* *talonsa:* `talo+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3`
* *talomme:* `talo+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1`
* *talonne:* `talo+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2`

### Compound forms
In compound analyses, the derived compound form that is not a free morph
is marked with special analysis.  Some words have forms only appearing in
compounds.
Further reading: [VISK § 406](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=406)
Compound form

* *naisien:* `nainen+N+Der/s#ien+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # female gum)
